Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1162YH (2) 91 as/js H.F. 42 Section 1. Section 331.756, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 76. a. In the case of an officer-involved 3 shooting resulting in the death or serious bodily injury of a 4 person, review the evidence and render a written opinion and 5 charging decision, convene a grand jury, or refer the case to 6 the attorney general as provided in section 13.12. 7 b. A written report detailing the results of the review 8 specified in paragraph âaâ shall be provided within one hundred 9 eighty days to the officer involved or the officerâs legal 10 counsel and the officerâs employing agency. 11 c. If the case presents a conflict of interest, the review 12 shall be referred to an independent county attorney, the 13 attorney general, or a special prosecutor. 14 d. For the purposes of this subsection, âofficerâ means the 15 same as defined in section 801.4, subsection 11. 16